Utah statutes.
62A-15-638.   Reexamination of court order for commitment -- Procedures --
Costs.
(1)  Any patient committed pursuant to Section 62A-15-631 is entitled to a
reexamination of the order for commitment on the patient's own petition, or on
that of the legal guardian, parent, spouse, relative, or friend, to the
district court of the county in which the patient resides or is detained.
(2)  Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall conduct or cause to be
conducted by a mental health commissioner proceedings in accordance with
Section 62A-15-631, except that those proceedings shall not be required to be
conducted if the petition is filed sooner than six months after the issuance
of the order of commitment or the filing of a previous petition under this
section, provided that the court may hold a hearing within a shorter period of
time if good cause appears.  The costs of proceedings for such judicial
determination shall be paid by the county in which the patient resided or was
found prior to commitment, upon certification, by the clerk of the district
court in the county where the proceedings are held, to the county  legislative
body that those proceedings were held and the costs incurred.
